Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-303.11
Violations; civil penalty; recovery; procedure.

Any person who violates section 87-302 or 87-303.01 or who willfully violates the terms of an injunction or declaratory judgment of a district court or the terms of a written assurance of voluntary compliance entered into pursuant to the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars for each violation. The Attorney General, acting in the name of the state, may seek recovery of such civil penalties in a civil action. For purposes of this section, the district court which issues any injunction shall retain jurisdiction and the cause shall be continued while the Attorney General seeks the recovery of such civil penalties.

Laws 1990, LB 656, § 25;

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 34.